Hawaii statutes.
§271-14 No proprietary right in highway.
No certificate or permit issued under this chapter confers any proprietary or
property right in the use of the public highways. [L 1961, c 121, pt of §2;
Supp, §106C-12; HRS §271-14]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next